Illinois, session 104th, SB1256.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 3-616 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/3-616)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-616)7    Sec. 3-616. Disability license plates. 8    (a) Upon receiving an application for a certificate of 9registration for a motor vehicle of the first division, a 10motorcycle, an autocycle, or for a motor vehicle of the second 11division weighing no more than 8,000 pounds, accompanied with 12payment of the registration fees required under this Code from 13a person with disabilities or a person who is deaf or hard of 14hearing, the Secretary of State, if so requested, shall issue 15to such person registration plates as provided for in Section 163-611, provided that the person with disabilities or person 17who is deaf or hard of hearing must not be disqualified from 18obtaining a driver's license under subsection 8 of Section 196-103 of this Code, and further provided that any person 20making such a request must submit a statement, certified by a 21licensed physician, by a licensed physician assistant, or by a 22licensed advanced practice registered nurse, or by a licensed 23physical therapist, to the effect that such person is a person   SB1256 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 05740 LNS 15770 b1with disabilities as defined by Section 1-159.1 of this Code, 2or alternatively provide adequate documentation that such 3person has a Class 1A, Class 2A or Type Four disability under 4the provisions of Section 4A of the Illinois Identification 5Card Act. For purposes of this Section, an Illinois Person 6with a Disability Identification Card issued pursuant to the 7Illinois Identification Card Act indicating that the person 8thereon named has a disability shall be adequate documentation 9of such a disability.10    (b) The Secretary shall issue plates under this Section to 11a parent or legal guardian of a person with disabilities if the 12person with disabilities has a Class 1A or Class 2A disability 13as defined in Section 4A of the Illinois Identification Card 14Act or is a person with disabilities as defined by Section 151-159.1 of this Code, and does not possess a vehicle 16registered in his or her name, provided that the person with 17disabilities relies frequently on the parent or legal guardian 18for transportation. Only one vehicle per family may be 19registered under this subsection, unless the applicant can 20justify in writing the need for one additional set of plates. 21Any person requesting special plates under this subsection 22shall submit such documentation or such physician's, physician 23assistant's, or advanced practice registered nurse's, or 24physical therapist's statement as is required in subsection 25(a) and a statement describing the circumstances qualifying 26for issuance of special plates under this subsection. An   SB1256 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 05740 LNS 15770 b1optometrist may certify a Class 2A Visual Disability, as 2defined in Section 4A of the Illinois Identification Card Act, 3for the purpose of qualifying a person with disabilities for 4special plates under this subsection. 5    (c) The Secretary may issue a parking decal or device to a 6person with disabilities as defined by Section 1-159.1 without 7regard to qualification of such person with disabilities for a 8driver's license or registration of a vehicle by such person 9with disabilities or such person's immediate family, provided 10such person with disabilities making such a request has been 11issued an Illinois Person with a Disability Identification 12Card indicating that the person named thereon has a Class 1A or 13Class 2A disability, or alternatively, submits a statement 14certified by a licensed physician, or by a licensed physician 15assistant, or a licensed advanced practice registered nurse, 16or a licensed physical therapist as provided in subsection 17(a), to the effect that such person is a person with 18disabilities as defined by Section 1-159.1. An optometrist may 19certify a Class 2A Visual Disability as defined in Section 4A 20of the Illinois Identification Card Act for the purpose of 21qualifying a person with disabilities for a parking decal or 22device under this subsection.23    (d) The Secretary shall prescribe by rules and regulations 24procedures to certify or re-certify as necessary the 25eligibility of persons whose disabilities are other than 26permanent for special plates or parking decals or devices   SB1256 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 05740 LNS 15770 b1issued under subsections (a), (b) and (c). Except as provided 2under subsection (f) of this Section, no such special plates, 3decals or devices shall be issued by the Secretary of State to 4or on behalf of any person with disabilities unless such 5person is certified as meeting the definition of a person with 6disabilities pursuant to Section 1-159.1 or meeting the 7requirement of a Type Four disability as provided under 8Section 4A of the Illinois Identification Card Act for the 9period of time that the physician, or the physician assistant, 10or the advanced practice registered nurse, or the physical 11therapist as provided in subsection (a), determines the 12applicant will have the disability, but not to exceed 6 months 13from the date of certification or recertification.14    (e) Any person requesting special plates under this 15Section may also apply to have the special plates 16personalized, as provided under Section 3-405.1.17    (f) The Secretary of State, upon application, shall issue 18disability registration plates or a parking decal to 19corporations, school districts, State or municipal agencies, 20limited liability companies, nursing homes, convalescent 21homes, or special education cooperatives which will transport 22persons with disabilities. The Secretary shall prescribe by 23rule a means to certify or re-certify the eligibility of 24organizations to receive disability plates or decals and to 25designate which of the 2 person with disabilities emblems 26shall be placed on qualifying vehicles.  SB1256 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 05740 LNS 15770 b1    (g) The Secretary of State, or his designee, may enter 2into agreements with other jurisdictions, including foreign 3jurisdictions, on behalf of this State relating to the 4extension of parking privileges by such jurisdictions to 5residents of this State with disabilities who display a 6special license plate or parking device that contains the 7International symbol of access on his or her motor vehicle, 8and to recognize such plates or devices issued by such other 9jurisdictions. This State shall grant the same parking 10privileges which are granted to residents of this State with 11disabilities to any non-resident whose motor vehicle is 12licensed in another state, district, territory or foreign 13country if such vehicle displays the international symbol of 14access or a distinguishing insignia on license plates or 15parking device issued in accordance with the laws of the 16non-resident's state, district, territory or foreign country.17    (h) Any registration plate or parking decal or device 18issued under this Section to a person with a permanent 19disability, or the parent or guardian thereof, shall require 20certification of that permanent disability every 5 years by 21submitting to the Secretary a statement, certified by a 22licensed medical professional, declaring that such person is a 23person with a disability as provided under Section 1-159.1 of 24this Code. 25(Source: P.A. 103-843, eff. 1-1-25.)